Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-703
Intersections between railroads and highways; rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the manner in which the wires specified in section 75-702 will cross such railroad tracks in this state at public highway crossings.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 3, p. 1422;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 115.